Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 6, Chapter 334, O.S.L.


2025 (11 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 22-140.5), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 22-140.5. A. After a municipal code lien has been


recorded with the office of the county clerk of the county in which


the real property is located, the code enforcement director may


identify those properties on which to commence a judicial in rem


foreclosure in accordance with this act the Municipal Code Lien


Enforcement Act of 2025, except that those properties the code


enforcement director identifies as owner-occupied shall not be


subject to judicial in rem foreclosure under this act the Municipal

Req. No. 2683 Page 1


Code Lien Enforcement Act of 2025. The code enforcement director


shall not file a petition for judicial in rem foreclosure in


accordance with this act the Municipal Code Lien Enforcement Act of


2025 for a period of six (6) months following the date upon which


the municipal code lien is recorded in the office of the county


clerk. A petition for judicial in rem foreclosure may include any


other municipal code lien that has been filed prior to the date the


petition is filed. After enforcement proceedings have commenced in


accordance with this act the Municipal Code Lien Enforcement Act of


2025, the enforcement proceedings may be amended to include any


subsequently arising municipal code liens and, if applicable, any


and all taxes as defined in this act the Municipal Code Lien


Enforcement Act of 2025.


B. If the property on which the municipality is seeking to


foreclose under this act the Municipal Code Lien Enforcement Act of


2025 is subject to taxes as defined in this act the Municipal Code


Lien Enforcement Act of 2025, then, at least sixty (60) days prior


to the filing of the petition, the code enforcement director shall


notify all other taxing agencies within the jurisdiction of the


municipality and the State of Oklahoma this state of the code


enforcement director’s intention to file a petition for judicial in


rem foreclosure of the real property on which a municipal code lien


exists.



Req. No. 2683 Page 2


C. If the property on which the municipality is seeking to


foreclose under this section is subject to a recorded mortgage, at


least sixty (60) days prior to the filing of the petition, the code


enforcement director shall notify all mortgage holders within the


jurisdiction of the municipality and this state of the code


enforcement director’s intention to file a petition for judicial in


rem foreclosure of the real property on which a municipal code lien


exists.


D. In the name of the municipality, the code enforcement


director shall, in the appropriate lis pendens record in the office


of the county clerk of the county in which the real property is


located, file a notice of his or her intent to file a judicial in


rem foreclosure action. The notice shall include a legal


description of the property, street address of the property if


available, a statement that the property is subject to judicial in


rem foreclosure proceedings under this act the Municipal Code Lien


Enforcement Act of 2025, and a statement that those proceedings may


extinguish any legal interests in the property.


D. E. Simultaneous with the filing of his or her notice of


intent to file a judicial in rem foreclosure action, the code


enforcement director, in the name of the municipality, shall file a


petition with the clerk of the district court for the district in


which the real property is located.



Req. No. 2683 Page 3


E. F. The petition shall be filed against the real property


against which the municipal code lien has been recorded and shall


provide all of the following:


1. The identity of the municipality and the name and address of


the code enforcement director;


2. The real property address;


3. A description of the real property;


4. The tax identification number of the real property;


5. The municipal code lien which is being foreclosed;


6. The principal amount of the municipal code lien together


with applicable interest and penalties;


7. The principal amount of any additional municipal code liens


together with applicable interest and penalties in accordance with


this section, if any;


8. The year or years for which the taxes are delinquent, if


any;


9. The principal amount of the taxes together with interest and


penalties, if any;


10. A statement that upon final sale in accordance with this


act the Municipal Code Lien Enforcement Act of 2025 and payment of


the amount due for taxes, if applicable, an interested party’s


rights of redemption shall be extinguished; and





Req. No. 2683 Page 4


11. The names and addresses of all interested parties to whom


copies of the petition are to be sent in accordance with subsection


F G of this section.


F. G. The municipality shall mail copies of the petition by


both certified mail, return receipt requested, and by regular mail


to all interested parties whose identities and addresses are


reasonably ascertainable. Copies of the petition shall also be


mailed by first-class mail to the real property address to the


attention of the occupants of the property, if any. In addition,


notice shall be physically posted on the real property and shall


include the following statement: “THIS PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO A


JUDICIAL IN REM FORECLOSURE ACTION AND MAY BE TRANSFERRED TO [NAME


OF MUNICIPALITY] OR ANOTHER PARTY. PERSONS WITH INFORMATION


REGARDING THE CURRENT OWNER OF THE PROPERTY ARE REQUESTED TO CONTACT


[NAME OF MUNICIPALITY].”


G. H. Within thirty (30) days of the filing of the petition,


the municipality shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition


to be published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a


newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property


is located. Such notice shall specify:


1. The name and address of the code enforcement director;


2. The real property address;


3. A description of the real property;


4. The tax identification number of the real property;

Req. No. 2683 Page 5


5. Any applicable municipal code lien which is being foreclosed


upon;


6. The principal amount of any municipal code lien together


with interest and penalties;


7. The applicable period of tax delinquency, if any;


8. The principal amount of taxes, if any;


9. That upon deposit with the appropriate parties by the court


of the tax payoff amount, if any, any and all rights of redemption


accorded to interested parties are extinguished; and


10. The date and place of the filing of the petition.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2027.




60-2-2683 BLB 1/14/2026 10:11:09 AM























Req. No. 2683 Page 6